Georgia, session 2025_26, SB261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 25 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the magistrates
retirement fund, is amended by revising Code Section 47-25-41, relating to member dues,
as follows:
"47-25-41.
Each member shall pay into the fund as dues a sum equal to 3.42 4.0 percent of the
member's maximum average final monthly compensation established by subsection (a) of
S. B. 261
- 1 -

LC 56 0263
Code Section 47-25-81 per month. Each month's dues shall be paid not later than the tenth
day of that month."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 47-25-80, relating to requirements
to receiving benefits, as follows:
"47-25-80.
(a) In order for a member to be eligible to receive retirement benefits under this chapter,
he or she must have:
(1) Served as a regularly qualified and commissioned chief magistrate or as the
secretary-treasurer for at least eight years;
(2) Fully complied with this chapter;
(3) Terminated his or her official capacity as a chief magistrate or as the
secretary-treasurer;
(4) Attained the age of 60 55 years;
(5) Filed with the board his or her application for such retirement, on a form to be
furnished by the board, within a period of 90 days, or as soon thereafter as possible, after
reaching the age of 60 55 years or after termination of his or her official capacity as a
chief magistrate or as the secretary-treasurer, whichever may occur last in point of time;
and
(6) Had his or her application for retirement approved by the board.
(b) If a member retires prior to the age of 60, his or her benefit, as calculated pursuant to
Code Section 47-25-81, shall be reduced by one-twelfth of 3 percent for each month by
which his or her age at the time of retirement is below 60 years."
S. B. 261
- 2 -

LC 56 0263
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 47-25-81, relating to the amount
of benefits, as follows:
"47-25-81.
(a) Any member who is approved for retirement benefits as provided in Code Section
47-25-80 shall be paid a monthly sum equal to 4 5 percent of his or her average final
monthly compensation for each year served by the member up to, but not exceeding, a total
of 20 28 years; provided, however, that the final annual monthly compensation used for
calculating a benefit under this Code section shall not exceed an amount set pursuant to
subsection (b) of this Code section. $42,781.22 or the amount fixed in the following
schedule according to county population, whichever amount is higher:
Maximum Average Final
Population Monthly Compensation
500,000 or more . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,247.87
400,000 - 499,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,975.70
300,000 - 399,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,703.53
250,000 - 299,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 6,072.65
200,000 - 249,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,594.17
150,000 - 199,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 5,132.49
100,000 - 149,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,797.70
75,000 - 99,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,490.76
50,000 - 74,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 4,183.47
39,000 - 49,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,732.53
29,000 - 38,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,512.80
20,000 - 28,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,293.34
S. B. 261
- 3 -

LC 56 0263
11,890 - 19,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 3,073.88
6,000 - 11,889 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 2,713.53
0 - 5,999 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1,975.98
(b) The board of commissioners is authorized to shall adopt from time to time a method
or methods of providing for increases in the a maximum final monthly compensation used
for calculating a benefit as provided in this Code section. Such method or methods
maximum final monthly compensation shall be based upon:
(1) The recommendation of the actuary of the board of commissioners;
(2) The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the
standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted
by the board; and
(3) Such other factors as the board deems relevant; provided, however, that any such
increase shall be uniform and shall apply equally to all members of this retirement
system.
(c) No time for which dues have not been paid in accordance with Code Section 47-25-41
shall be considered in determining the number of years of service."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026, only if it is determined to have been
concurrently funded as provided in Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, the "Public Retirement Systems Standards Law"; otherwise, this Act shall not
become effective and shall be automatically repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2026, as
required by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-50.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 261
- 4 -